test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-yaxaTS_gt-norm.yaml
  Noun - яха: # Noun 'river /(fin) joki' - full paradigm /yəxa a(→ye)→yi/
     яха+N+Sg+Nom: яха
     яха+N+Sg+Acc: яхамʼ
     яха+N+Sg+Gen: яхаʼ
     яха+N+Sg+Dat: яханʼ
     яха+N+Sg+Loc: яхахана
     яха+N+Sg+Abl: яхахад
     яха+N+Sg+Pros: яхавна
     яха+N+Du+Nom: яхахаʼ
     яха+N+Du+Acc: яхахаʼ
     яха+N+Du+Gen: яхахаʼ
     яха+N+Pl+Nom: яхаˮ
     яха+N+Pl+Acc: еси
     яха+N+Pl+Gen: есиˮ
     яха+N+Pl+Dat: яхахаˮ
     яха+N+Pl+Loc: яхахаˮна
     яха+N+Pl+Abl: яхахат
     яха+N+Pl+Pros: есиˮмана
     яха+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: [яхахадан, яхахадани, яхахадни]
     яха+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: [яхав, яхами]
     яха+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: [яхахан, яхахани]
     яха+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: [яхан, яхани]
     яха+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: [яхаханан, яхаханани]
     яха+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: [яхав, яхами]
     яха+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg1: [яхавнан, яхавнани]
     яха+N+Du+Acc+PxSg1: [яхахаюн, яхахаюни]
     яха+N+Du+Gen+PxSg1: [яхахаюн, яхахаюни]
     яха+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1: [яхахаюн, яхахаюни]
     яха+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg1: [яхахатан, яхахатани, яхахатни]
     яха+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: [есин, есини]
     яха+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: [яхахаˮн, яхахаˮни]
     яха+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: [есиˮн, есиˮни]
     яха+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: [яхахаˮнан, яхахаˮнани]
     яха+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: [есин, есини]
     яха+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg1: [есиˮманан, есиˮманани]
     яха+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: яхар
     яха+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: яхамд
     яха+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: яханд
     яха+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg2: яхаханд
     яха+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: яхахананд
     яха+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg2: яхахаданд
     яха+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg2: яхавнанд
     яха+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2: яхахаюд
     яха+N+Du+Acc+PxSg2: яхахаюд
     яха+N+Du+Gen+PxSg2: яхахают
     яха+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: есид
     яха+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: есид
     яха+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: есит
     яха+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg2: яхахат
     яха+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg2: яхахаˮнат
     яха+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg2: яхахатат
     яха+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg2: есиˮманат
     яха+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: яхада
     яха+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: яхамда
     яха+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: яханда
     яха+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: яхаханда
     яха+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: яхахананда
     яха+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg3: яхахаданда
     яха+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg3: яхавнанда
     яха+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3: яхахаюда
     яха+N+Du+Acc+PxSg3: яхахаюда
     яха+N+Du+Gen+PxSg3: яхахаюта
     яха+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: есида
     яха+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: есида
     яха+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: есита
     яха+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: яхахата
     яха+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg3: яхахаˮната
     яха+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg3: [яхахатата, яхахатта]
     яха+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg3: есиˮманата
     яха+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1: яхамиʼ
#     яха+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1.2: яхами
     яха+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu1: яхамиʼ
#     яха+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1.2: яхами
     яха+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: яханиʼ
#     яха+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1.2: яхани
     яха+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu1: яхаханиʼ
#     яха+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1.2: яхахани
     яха+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu1: яхахананиʼ
#     яха+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1.2: яхаханани
     яха+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu1: [яхахаданиʼ, яхахадниʼ]
#     яха+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1.2: [яхахадани, яхахадни]
     яха+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu1: яхавнаниʼ
#     яха+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg1.2: яхавнани
     яха+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1: яхахаюниʼ
#     яха+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1.2: яхахаюни
     яха+N+Du+Acc+PxDu1: яхахаюниʼ
#     яха+N+Du+Acc+PxSg1.2: яхахаюни
     яха+N+Du+Gen+PxDu1: яхахаюниʼ
#     яха+N+Du+Gen+PxSg1.2: яхахаюни
     яха+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1: есиниʼ
#     яха+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1.2: есини
     яха+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu1: есиниʼ
#     яха+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1.2: есини
     яха+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu1: есиˮниʼ
#     яха+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1.2: есиˮни
     яха+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu1: яхахаˮниʼ
#     яха+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1.2: яхахаˮни
     яха+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu1: яхахаˮнаниʼ
#     яха+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1.2: яхахаˮнани
     яха+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu1: [яхахатаниʼ, яхахатниʼ]
#     яха+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg1.2: [яхахатани, яхахатни]
     яха+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu1: есиˮмананиʼ
#     яха+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg1.2: есиˮманани
     яха+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2: яхариʼ
     яха+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu2: яхамдиʼ
     яха+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu2: яхандиʼ
     яха+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu2: яхахандиʼ
     яха+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu2: яхаханандиʼ
     яха+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu2: яхахадандиʼ
     яха+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu2: яхавнандиʼ
     яха+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2: яхахаюдиʼ
     яха+N+Du+Acc+PxDu2: яхахаюдиʼ
     яха+N+Du+Gen+PxDu2: яхахаютиʼ
     яха+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2: есидиʼ
     яха+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu2: есидиʼ
     яха+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu2: еситиʼ
     яха+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu2: яхахатиʼ
     яха+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu2: яхахаˮнатиʼ
     яха+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu2: [яхахататиʼ, яхахаттиʼ]
     яха+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu2: есиˮманатиʼ
     яха+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3: яхадиʼ
     яха+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu3: яхамдиʼ
     яха+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu3: яхандиʼ
     яха+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu3: яхахандиʼ
     яха+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu3: яхаханандиʼ
     яха+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu3: яхахадандиʼ
     яха+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu3: яхавнандиʼ
     яха+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3: яхахаюдиʼ
     яха+N+Du+Acc+PxDu3: яхахаюдиʼ
     яха+N+Du+Gen+PxDu3: яхахаютиʼ
     яха+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3: есидиʼ
     яха+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu3: есидиʼ
     яха+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu3: еситиʼ
     яха+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu3: яхахатиʼ
     яха+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu3: яхахаˮнатиʼ
     яха+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu3: [яхахататиʼ, яхахаттиʼ]
     яха+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu3: есиˮманатиʼ
     яха+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: яхаваˮ
     яха+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: яхаваˮ
     яха+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: яханаˮ
     яха+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl1: яхаханаˮ
     яха+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl1: яхахананаˮ
     яха+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl1: [яхахаданаˮ, яхахаднаˮ]
     яха+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl1: яхавнанаˮ
     яха+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1: яхахаюнаˮ
     яха+N+Du+Acc+PxPl1: яхахаюнаˮ
     яха+N+Du+Gen+PxPl1: яхахаюнаˮ
     яха+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: есинаˮ
     яха+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: есинаˮ
     яха+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: есиˮнаˮ
     яха+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl1: яхахаˮнаˮ
     яха+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl1: яхахаˮнанаˮ
     яха+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl1: [яхахатанаˮ, яхахатнаˮ]
     яха+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl1: есиˮмананаˮ
     яха+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: яхараˮ
     яха+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: яхамдаˮ
     яха+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: яхандаˮ
     яха+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl2: яхахандаˮ
     яха+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: яхаханандаˮ
     яха+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl2: яхахадандаˮ
     яха+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl2: яхавнандаˮ
     яха+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2: яхахаюдаˮ
     яха+N+Du+Acc+PxPl2: яхахаюдаˮ
     яха+N+Du+Gen+PxPl2: яхахаютаˮ
     яха+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: есидаˮ
     яха+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: есидаˮ
     яха+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: еситаˮ
     яха+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl2: яхахатаˮ
     яха+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl2: яхахаˮнатаˮ
     яха+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl2: [яхахататаˮ, яхахаттаˮ]
     яха+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl2: есиˮманатаˮ
     яха+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: яхадоʼ
     яха+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: яхамдоʼ
     яха+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: яхандоʼ
     яха+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl3: яхахандоʼ
     яха+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: яхаханандоʼ
     яха+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl3: яхахадандоʼ
     яха+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl3: яхавнандоʼ
     яха+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3: яхахаюдоʼ
     яха+N+Du+Acc+PxPl3: яхахаюдоʼ
     яха+N+Du+Gen+PxPl3: яхахаютоʼ
     яха+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: есидоʼ
     яха+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: есидоʼ
     яха+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: еситоʼ
     яха+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl3: яхахатоʼ
     яха+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl3: яхахаˮнатоʼ
     яха+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl3: [яхахататоʼ, яхахаттоʼ]
     яха+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl3: есиˮманатоʼ
     яха+N+Pred+Abs: яхад
     яха+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg1: [яхадав, яхадув, яхадами]
#     яха+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg1.2: яхадами
     яха+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg1: [яхадан, яхадани]
#     яха+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg1.2: яхадани
     яха+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg1: [яхадав, яхадув, яхадами]
#     яха+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg1.2: яхадами
     яха+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg2: яхадамд
     яха+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg2: яхаданд
     яха+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg2: яхадар
     яха+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg3: яхадамда
     яха+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg3: яхаданда
     яха+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg3: яхадада
     яха+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu1: яхадамиʼ
     яха+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu1: яхаданиʼ
     яха+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu1: яхадамиʼ
     яха+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu2: яхадамдиʼ
     яха+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu2: яхадандиʼ
     яха+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu2: яхадариʼ
     яха+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu3: яхадамдиʼ
     яха+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu3: яхадандиʼ
     яха+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu3: яхададиʼ
     яха+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl1: яхадаваˮ
     яха+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl1: яхаданаˮ
     яха+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl1: яхадаваˮ
     яха+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl2: яхадамдаˮ
     яха+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl2: яхадандаˮ
     яха+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl2: яхадараˮ
     яха+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl3: яхадамдоʼ
     яха+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl3: яхадандоʼ
     яха+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl3: яхададоʼ
     яха+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg1: яхадмʼ
     яха+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg2: яхан
     яха+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: яха
     яха+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu1: яханиʼ
     яха+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu2: яхадиʼ
     яха+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: яхахаʼ
     яха+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl1: яхаваˮ
     яха+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl2: яхадаˮ
     яха+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: яхаˮ
     яха+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1: яхадамзь
     яха+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2: яханась
     яха+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: яхась
     яха+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1: яханинзь
     яха+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2: яхадинзь
     яха+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: яхаханзь
     яха+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1: яхаваць
     яха+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2: яхадаць
     яха+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: яхаць
     яха+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: яхав
     яха+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: яхар
     яха+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: яхада
     яха+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: яхамиʼ
     яха+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: яхариʼ
     яха+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: яхадиʼ
     яха+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: яхаваˮ
     яха+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: яхараˮ
     яха+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: яхадоʼ
     яха+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: яхавась
     яха+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: яхарась
     яха+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: яхадась
     яха+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: яхаминзь
     яха+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: яхаринзь
     яха+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: яхадинзь
     яха+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: яхаваць
     яха+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: яхараць
     яха+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: яхадонзь
     яха+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: яхахаюн
     яха+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: яхахаюд
     яха+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: яхахаюда
     яха+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: яхахаюниʼ
     яха+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: яхахаюдиʼ
     яха+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: яхахаюдиʼ
     яха+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: яхахаюнаˮ
     яха+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: яхахаюдаˮ
     яха+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: яхахаюдоʼ
     яха+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: яхахаюнась
     яха+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: яхахаюдась
     яха+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: яхахаюдась
     яха+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: яхахаюнинзь
     яха+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: яхахаюдинзь
     яха+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: яхахаюдинзь
     яха+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: яхахаюнаць
     яха+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: яхахаюдаць
     яха+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: яхахаюдонзь
     яха+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: есин
     яха+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: есид
     яха+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: есида
     яха+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: есиниʼ
     яха+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: есидиʼ
     яха+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: есидиʼ
     яха+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: есинаˮ
     яха+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: есидаˮ
     яха+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: есидоʼ
     яха+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: есинась
     яха+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: есидась
     яха+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: есидась
     яха+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: есининзь
     яха+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: есидинзь
     яха+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: есидинзь
     яха+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: есинаць
     яха+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: есидаць
     яха+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: есидонзь
     яха+N+Tra: яхаӈэ
     яха+N+Car: яхасиˮ
     яха+N+Equ: яхадаремʼ
     яха+N+Equ+Lat: яхадаревʼ
